Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-471
Dissolving district; expenses incurred by school district; charge against district and taxable property therein.

Any expenses incurred by a school district in opposing an order dissolving it under section 79-470 or 79-598 shall be a charge only against such district and the taxable property therein.

Laws 1973, LB 148, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-604;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 220.